Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2302XS (2) 91 th/jh S.F. 261 Section 1. Section 68B.22, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. Moneys received by a local official 3 or local employee in the form of donations from other local 4 officials or local employees to offset medical or health 5 care expenses as a result of a diagnosed condition, if such 6 donations are made and received through the use of an online 7 crowdfunding or fundraising platform. An authorized donation 8 from a donor to a recipient under this paragraph shall not 9 exceed one hundred dollars per calendar year. 10